Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-2141
Instrument of conveyance; execution; effect.

Any instrument executed by an authority and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest in any property under the Community Development Law shall be conclusive evidence of compliance with the Community Development Law insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or other transferees of such property is concerned.

Laws 1951, c. 224, § 19, p. 820;

R.R.S.1943, § 14-1641;

R.R.S.1943, § 19-2641;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 29.
July 19, 2018